Vermont, session 2025-2026, H680.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS; LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Good access to primary care is essential for the health of Vermonters
and for reducing the need for more costly services, but Vermont’s health care
system currently does not provide access to primary care with the timeliness
and scope that Vermonters need. This lack of access pushes patients to seek
traditional primary care services from specialists, urgent care clinics,
emergency departments, pharmacies, out-of-state telehealth platforms, and
other sources, further fragmenting care, reducing the professional satisfaction
of primary care clinicians, and undermining patient trust in the primary care
medical system.
(2) Primary care clinicians and patients face significant system-imposed
administrative and cost burdens that delay or restrict provision of and access to
high-value primary care. In addition, primary care clinicians are not
compensated commensurate with their value to the health care system. As a
result, many primary care clinicians are leaving their Vermont practices, and
too few new clinicians are replacing them. Other clinicians are choosing a
concierge or direct-care practice model in an effort to restore the focus on the
patient-provider relationship and to avoid some of the cumbersome barriers in
the health care system. While these models offer significant benefits to both
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 3 of 15
patients and providers, the patient panel sizes are generally much smaller than
in traditional practice models, so more such practices are needed to meet the
State’s overall primary care needs.
(3) Vermont’s health care system is in a state of crisis. Premiums in the
commercial health insurance markets are increasingly out of reach for
individual Vermonters, their families, private employers, and public employers
such as schools and State and local governments. Increasing support for our
primary care system in service of improving access to primary and preventive
services is Vermont’s best opportunity for short- and long-term improvements
to Vermont’s health care system and to the health of Vermonters.
(4) Access reform for primary care must support the four key functions
of primary care—first-contact access, comprehensiveness, coordination, and
continuity—which are essential to meeting the goals of improved quality and
reduced spending. The success of access reform is highly dependent on
alignment across payers and is unlikely to work if only a small subset of a
practice’s patient population is included. Increased investment in primary care
across public and private payers using value-based care models designed for
primary care will contribute significantly to improving health, reducing
inequities, reducing the per capita cost of care over time, and improving the
well-being of the primary care team.
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 4 of 15
(5) A national time study revealed that during the office day, physicians
spent 27.0 percent of their total time on direct clinical face time with patients
and 49.2 percent of their time on electronic health records and desk work. A
2022 study found that primary care clinicians would need to work 26.7 hours
per day to provide guideline-recommended primary care to the typical patient
panel, including documentation and message management.
(6) In 2020, the Green Mountain Care Board and the Department of
Vermont Health Access submitted a report to the General Assembly that
calculated primary care spending, both across all payers and by payer type, as a
proportion of health care spending. The report found that 10.2 percent of all
health care spending was allocated to primary care, though investment varied
by payer, with Medicare at 6.5 percent, Medicaid at 24.3 percent, and
commercial health insurance at 9.2 percent.
(7) The Green Mountain Care Board and the Agency of Human Services
already have experience calculating primary care spending using both a State-
specific definition of primary care and the New England States Consortium
Systems Organization’s (NESCSO) definition. Vermont is required to set a
primary care spending target for purposes of the federal AHEAD model and
has already proposed using the NESCSO definition of primary care.
(b) By enacting this act, it is the intent of the General Assembly to invest in
primary care by establishing a streamlined primary care payment system that
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 5 of 15
will promote the public good by increasing access to primary care in order to
improve the health of Vermonters and reduce health care system costs.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 721 is added to read:
§ 721. PRIMARY CARE ACCESS REFORM PROGRAM
(a)(1) The Agency of Human Services, in coordination with the Green
Mountain Care Board, the Blueprint for Health, and the Vermont Steering
Committee for Comprehensive Primary Health Care, and in consultation with
other interested stakeholders, shall develop and implement a primary care
access reform program that will promote the public good by investing in
primary care and reducing administrative burdens in order to increase access to
care and reduce health system costs.
(2) The primary care access reform program shall be voluntary for
primary care practices and shall be funded by allocating a portion of
commercial health insurance premiums; a portion of premium equivalents from
other participating payers; and, to the extent permitted by federal law, waivers
of federal law, and federal initiatives, public funds from Medicare and
Medicaid.
(3) The program shall collect and aggregate payments from participating
payers in order to provide a capitated, per-member per-month payment to each
participating primary care practice to cover all of the routine primary care
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 6 of 15
needs of attributed patients who are covered by participating plans, without
any patient cost-sharing requirements.
(b)(1) To the extent that the program includes any practice participation
requirements, administrative or documentation requirements, or quality
measurements, the Agency shall establish them in a manner that streamlines
and reduces the administrative burdens on primary care practices imposed by
the program and by public and private payers, including aligning with and
incorporating necessary Blueprint for Health requirements.
(2) The program shall establish not more than 12 quality measures and
may require a primary care practice to adopt not more than six of them. Each
quality measure shall be claims-derived, patient-centered, appropriate for a
primary care setting, and supported by peer-reviewed, evidence-based research
indicating that the measure is actionable and that its use will lead to
improvements in patient health.
(3) The program shall identify and reform administrative burdens and
requirements imposed on primary care providers, including data collection
requirements, data system coordination, increased uniformity of requirements
across networks and payers, and electronic health records requirements.
(4) Practice participation requirements shall include reasonable access
improvement standards, the goals of which are to make meaningful progress
toward reducing the percentage of primary care practices that are not accepting
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 7 of 15
new patients and toward reducing the average wait times for appointments.
The standards shall incorporate metrics for measuring progress in achieving
these goals. Initiatives that practices may implement to meet the access
improvement standards may include accepting walk-in patients, increasing the
number of same-day appointments, adopting extended hours, and undertaking
other appropriate access improvement efforts.
(c) The Agency shall adopt by rule a risk-adjusted allocation model for
primary care practices participating in the access reform program that may be
informed by previous accountable care organization payment methodologies
and may blend base per-member per-month capitated payments with fee-for-
service payments as needed for specific primary care services. The allocation
shall include a reimbursement model and level that:
(1) accomplishes Vermont’s primary care spending target as set forth in
subsection (h) of this section;
(2) supports sufficient access to and sustainability of primary care
services in Vermont;
(3) incorporates different methodologies as needed to address the unique
needs of all practice types, including independent practices, federally qualified
health centers and rural health centers, and hospital-based primary care
practices;
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 8 of 15
(4) incorporates a methodology with the flexibility necessary to support
and adjust for the different scope of services delivered by different practices;
(5) accounts for the closure of accountable care organizations;
(6) accurately attributes patients to primary care practices;
(7) is sufficient to support practices in offering comprehensive, team-
based primary care that includes supports for mental health and social drivers
of health; and
(8) to the extent permitted under federal law, does not require
individuals covered by participating health plans to pay cost-sharing amounts
when receiving routine primary care services from participating primary care
providers and practices.
(d) The Agency shall operate a payment pool to:
(1) collect the primary care allocation of premiums, premium
equivalents, and public program funds due from each payer; and
(2) determine the per capita payments or other payment mechanism to
distribute the funds to participating primary care practices.
(e) The Agency of Human Services shall adopt rules in accordance with 3
V.S.A. chapter 25 to implement the primary care access reform program,
including:
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 9 of 15
(1) determining the scope of the primary care services to be included in
the capitated rate and the primary care practices that are eligible for
participation in the program;
(2) if using, practice participation requirements, administrative and
documentation requirements, and quality measurements, in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section;
(3) the risk-adjusted allocation model, in accordance with subsection (c)
of this section;
(4) operation of the payment pool, in accordance with subsection (d) of
this section;
(5) program parameters that address and mitigate against practices
avoiding high-risk patients or otherwise engaging in adverse selection, while
also striving to maximize practice eligibility and participation;
(6) definitions of direct and indirect primary care spending and
appropriate limits on indirect primary care spending as a percentage of health
care spending, as set forth in subdivision (g)(2) of this section; and
(7) benchmarks for determining the program’s performance, as set forth
in subdivision (g)(3) of this section.
(f) The Agency of Human Services or the Green Mountain Care Board, or
both, shall enter into negotiations with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services in order to secure Medicare participation in the primary care access
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 10 of 15
reform program. The Agency or Board, or both, shall also conduct outreach to
self-funded, nongovernmental employer-sponsored plans regarding
opportunities for their voluntary participation in the program and to discuss
with interested plans the appropriate allocation of premium equivalents to be
paid into the payment pool, which amounts should not unfairly disadvantage
individuals covered by fully insured plans, self-funded governmental plans, or
public benefit programs.
(g)(1) Implementation of the primary care access reform program shall
increase the proportion of total annual health care spending on behalf of
Vermont residents that is spent on primary care, with an initial primary care
spending allocation target of 15 percent of the total amount spent for all health
care services delivered to Vermont residents both within and outside Vermont,
to be met not later than January 1, 2029. The Agency shall establish a
transitional schedule that increases the proportion of primary care spending
over time in order to achieve the primary care spending target. The increased
spending for primary care shall not result in an increase in the overall amount
of health care spending for Vermont residents’ care.
(2) The Agency shall limit indirect primary care spending, as defined by
rule, as a percentage of total primary care spending for purposes of the primary
care spending target.
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 11 of 15
(3) The Agency may establish a new, higher primary care spending
target after the initial target has been achieved if the Agency’s analysis
determines that the primary care access reform program has met specific
benchmarks established by the Agency by rule, in areas including access to
primary care, quality of primary care services delivered, impact on health
outcomes, and containment of overall health care costs.
(4) For purposes of the primary care spending allocation target, the
Agency shall use a definition of primary care services that aligns with the
definition used in the 2020 report determining the proportion of health care
spending in Vermont that is allocated to primary care, which was submitted to
the General Assembly by the Green Mountain Care Board and the Department
of Vermont Health Access in accordance with 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 17,
Sec. 2, and with the definition of primary care services used by the New
England States Consortium Systems Organization (NESCSO).
(5)(A) Each health insurer with at least 5,000 covered lives under a
health insurance plan issued, delivered, or issued for delivery in Vermont shall
comply with the requirements of this subsection (g), including meeting or
exceeding the annual primary care spending targets established pursuant to this
subsection (g).
(B) In meeting its annual primary care spending obligations, each
health insurer shall:
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 12 of 15
(i) ensure that the individuals covered by its fully insured plans do
not bear a greater financial burden than their fair share of the expenses related
to the insurer’s compliance with its obligations under this subsection (g), with
a proportional amount borne by individuals covered by noninsured plans
administered by the insurer, if any; and
(ii) for nonprimary care services, adjust reimbursement rates,
implement utilization management tools, and take other steps as needed to
avoid increasing the health insurer’s total health care spending, to the extent
feasible and in accordance with rules and guidance adopted by the program.
(C) As used in this subdivision (5), “health insurer” has the same
meaning as in section 9402 of this title.
(D) The Agency, in consultation with the Department of Financial
Regulation and the Green Mountain Care Board, may adopt rules as
appropriate to carry out the purposes of this subdivision (5).
Sec. 3. PRIMARY CARE ACCESS REFORM PROGRAM;
IMPLEMENTATION DATE; REPORTS
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall begin operating the primary care
access reform program established in Sec. 2 of this act on or before July 1,
2027.
(b) On or before December 15, 2026, the Agency of Human Services, in
coordination with the Green Mountain Care Board, shall report to the House
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 13 of 15
Committee on Health Care, the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare, and
the Health Reform Oversight Committee regarding:
(1) progress in establishing the primary care access reform program and
a timeline for its implementation; and
(2) options for revenue sources and mechanisms, along with an
operational and financial plan, for expanding the program not later than
January 1, 2028, to any patient of a participating practice, regardless of type of
the individual’s health coverage or coverage status.
Sec. 4. VERMONT CLINICIAN LANDSCAPE; SITE-NEUTRAL
REIMBURSEMENTS; REPORTS
On or before January 1, 2027, the Green Mountain Care Board shall report
to the House Committee on Health Care and the Senate Committee on Health
and Welfare with:
(1) an updated version of the Board’s 2017 Vermont Clinician
Landscape Study report that reflects the current climate among practicing
clinicians in Vermont; and
(2) an updated version of the Board’s previous reporting regarding site-
neutral reimbursements pursuant to 2015 Acts and Resolves No. 54, Sec. 23;
2016 Acts and Resolves No. 143, Sec. 5; and 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 85,
Sec. E.345.1, including the current state of reimbursement differentials based
on practice setting and ownership type, along with a description of any
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 14 of 15
significant efforts that have been implemented since 2017 toward achieving
site-neutral reimbursements.
Sec. 5. INVESTMENTS IN PRIMARY CARE WORKFORCE
The sum of $6,750,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Health in fiscal year 2027 for investments in the primary care
workforce as follows:
(1) $1,250,000.00 for the first year of implementation of the Maple
Mountain Family Medicine Residency Program, a new Teaching Health Center
Graduate Medical Education Program that will increase the number of family
medicine residents practicing in rural regions of Vermont. It is the intent of the
General Assembly to appropriate funds in future fiscal years to allow for full
implementation of the Program.
(2) $500,000.00 for the Medical Student Incentive Scholarship Program
at the University of Vermont College of Medicine established pursuant to 18
V.S.A. § 33.
(3) $5,000,000.00 for the Vermont Educational Loan Repayment
Program established pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 32, to be used for loan repayment
for physicians licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33; naturopathic
physicians licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 81; advanced practice
registered nurses licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 28, subchapter 2; and
physician assistants licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 31, who practice in
VT LEG #386171 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.680
2026 Page 15 of 15
primary care, in order to fully fund existing demand for the Program using the
number of applicants and the needs demonstrated when additional funding was
made available through the American Rescue Plan Act, P. L. No. 117-2. It is
the intent of the General Assembly to continue this investment annually until
Vermont reaches an adequate supply of primary care clinicians relative to
benchmarks.
Sec. 6. 2020 Acts and Resolves No. 155, Sec. 7a, as amended by 2021 Acts
and Resolves No. 74, Sec. E.311.2, is further amended to read:
Sec. 7a. SUNSET
18 V.S.A. § 33 (medical students; primary care) is repealed on July 1, 2027.
[Deleted.]
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that Sec. 5 (investments in
primary care workforce) shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386171 v.1